Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 5287SV (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2300 Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 80. a. Annually distribute, both 3 electronically and by regular mail, the most recent version of 4 the United States department of educationâs guidance related to 5 constitutionally protected prayer and religious expression in 6 public elementary and secondary schools to all of the following 7 individuals: 8 (1) Each member of the board of directors of each school 9 district. 10 (2) Each member of the governing board of each charter 11 school established pursuant to chapter 256E. 12 (3) Each superintendent employed by each school district. 13 (4) Each principal employed by each school district. 14 (5) Each principal employed by each charter school 15 established pursuant to chapter 256E. 16 (6) Each principal employed by each charter school or 17 innovation zone school established pursuant to chapter 256F. 18 (7) Each teacher employed by each school district. 19 (8) Each teacher employed by each charter school 20 established pursuant to chapter 256E. 21 (9) Each teacher employed by each charter school or 22 innovation zone school established pursuant to chapter 256F. 23 b. Publish on the departmentâs internet site a link to 24 the most recent version of the United States department of 25 educationâs guidance related to constitutionally protected 26 prayer and religious expression in public elementary and 27 secondary schools. 28 c. Develop and distribute to school districts, charter 29 schools established pursuant to chapter 256E, and charter 30 schools and innovation zone schools established pursuant to 31 chapter 256F a professional development training program 32 regarding constitutionally protected prayer and religious 33 expression in public elementary and secondary schools. 34 NEW SUBSECTION . 81. Develop and distribute to school 35 -1- LSB 5287SV (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 8 S.F. 2300 districts, charter schools established pursuant to chapter 1 256E, and charter schools and innovation zone schools 2 established pursuant to chapter 256F a model policy that, if 3 adopted by a school district, charter school, or innovation 4 zone school, would satisfy the school districtâs, charter 5 schoolâs, or innovation zone schoolâs responsibilities under 6 section 279.89, subsection 4, paragraph âcâ , relating to 7 the adoption of policies to ensure compliance with federal 8 religious expression standards. 9 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 10 by adding the following new paragraph: 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0s. Be subject to and comply with the 12 requirements of section 279.89 relating to protected speech or 13 expression in the same manner as a school district. 14 Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0q. Be subject to and comply with the 17 requirements of section 279.89 relating to protected speech or 18 expression in the same manner as a school district. 19 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Protected speech and expression 20 ââ prohibitions ââ enforcement. 21 1. A school district shall not discriminate against or 22 penalize a student enrolled in the school district for doing 23 any of the following: 24 a. Engaging in religious, political, or ideological speech 25 in the same time, place, and manner, and to the same extent, 26 that other similarly situated students are authorized to engage 27 in speech at school. 28 b. Expressing a religious, political, or ideological 29 viewpoint in the same time, place, and manner, and to the same 30 extent, that other similarly situated students are authorized 31 to express views at school. 32 2. A school district shall allow a student who is enrolled 33 in the school district to engage in protected speech or 34 expression at school, which includes but is not limited to all 35 -2- LSB 5287SV (1) 91 jda/jh 2/ 8 S.F. 2300 of the following activities: 1 a. Expressing a religious, political, or ideological 2 viewpoint on the topic or subject of discussion or study during 3 class. 4 b. Expressing religious, political, or ideological 5 viewpoints in a homework assignment, artwork, presentation, or 6 other written or oral assignments, without being discriminated 7 against or the imposition of an academic penalty based on the 8 religious, political, or ideological content of the studentâs 9 expressions; provided, however, that a school district shall 10 assess a studentâs written and oral assignments using ordinary 11 academic standards of substance and relevance and other 12 legitimate pedagogical concerns identified by the school 13 district. 14 c. Organizing religious, political, or ideological 15 gatherings or clubs before, during, or after school to the same 16 extent, and with the same access to school facilities, as the 17 school district grants to other student-initiated gatherings 18 and clubs. 19 d. Wearing clothing, accessories, and jewelry that display 20 religious, political, or ideological messages or symbols in the 21 same manner, and to the same extent, as the school district 22 permits other students to wear clothing, accessories, and 23 jewelry that display messages and symbols. 24 3. A school district shall not discriminate against a club 25 organized by a student enrolled in the school district because 26 of any of the following: 27 a. The religious, political, or ideological viewpoints 28 expressed by the club. 29 b. The religious, political, or ideological viewpoints 30 expressed by students who are members of the club. 31 c. Any requirement that the leaders or members of the club 32 affirm or adhere to any particular beliefs, comply with the 33 clubâs standards of conduct, or further the clubâs mission or 34 purpose, as defined by the club. 35 -3- LSB 5287SV (1) 91 jda/jh 3/ 8 S.F. 2300 4. Each school district shall do all of the following: 1 a. Annually notify each employee of the school district of 2 the availability of the United States department of educationâs 3 guidance related to constitutionally protected prayer and 4 religious expression in public elementary and secondary 5 schools. 6 b. Offer professional development opportunities to each 7 employee of the school district regarding constitutionally 8 protected prayer and religious expression in public elementary 9 and secondary schools to ensure understanding and compliance. 10 c. (1) Adopt a policy that ensures the school district 11 complies with federal religious expression standards. 12 (2) Annually certify to the department of education that the 13 school district is in compliance with the policy described in 14 subparagraph (1). 15 5. a. Any individual or club organized by a student 16 alleging a violation of subsection 1, 2, 3, or 4 by a school 17 district may bring a civil action for declaratory relief, 18 injunctive relief, monetary damages, reasonable attorney fees, 19 court costs, and any other appropriate relief against the 20 school district. 21 b. A court shall assess a civil penalty of not less than 22 five thousand dollars against a school district that fails 23 to comply with subsection 1, 2, 3, or 4, in addition to any 24 monetary damages awarded pursuant to paragraph âaâ . The 25 civil penalty is payable to the prevailing individual or club 26 organized by a student. 27 c. Any individual or club organized by a student aggrieved 28 by a school districtâs violation of subsection 1, 2, 3, or 29 4 may assert such violation as a defense or counterclaim in 30 any disciplinary action, civil proceeding, or administrative 31 proceeding that is brought against the individual or club. 32 d. This subsection shall not be construed to limit any other 33 remedies available to any individual or club organized by a 34 student alleging a violation of subsection 1, 2, 3, or 4 by a 35 -4- LSB 5287SV (1) 91 jda/jh 4/ 8 S.F. 2300 school district. 1 e. A civil action brought under this subsection is barred 2 unless the action is commenced not later than two years 3 after the day the cause of action accrues. For purposes 4 of calculating this limitations period, each day that the 5 violation persists, including each day that a policy in 6 violation of subsection 4, paragraph âcâ , remains in effect, 7 shall constitute a new day that the cause of action has 8 accrued. 9 6. a. This section constitutes a waiver of any sovereign 10 immunity provided to school districts under the eleventh 11 amendment to the Constitution of the United States. 12 b. A school district that violates subsection 1, 2, 3, or 13 4 is not immune from suit or liability for such violation and 14 consents to suit in federal court for any actions arising under 15 this section. 16 7. This section shall not be construed to prevent a school 17 district from prohibiting, limiting, or restricting any of the 18 following: 19 a. Expression that is not protected under the first 20 amendment to the Constitution of the United States, including 21 true threats, obscenity, and expression that is directed to 22 provoke imminent lawless actions and likely to produce such 23 actions. 24 b. Expression that is unwelcome, and so severe, pervasive, 25 and subjectively and objectively offensive, that the 26 expression effectively denies a student access to educational 27 opportunities or benefits provided by the school district. 28 c. Conduct that intentionally, materially, and substantially 29 disrupts any of the following: 30 (1) The operations of the school district. 31 (2) The expressive activity of another individual if that 32 activity is occurring on school district property in an area 33 reserved for that activity under the exclusive use or control 34 of a particular student, group of students, or a club organized 35 -5- LSB 5287SV (1) 91 jda/jh 5/ 8 S.F. 2300 by a student. 1